Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 5
DIRECTORS

11-109-501. Directors' meetings - duties.

The board of directors of a trust company shall meet at least quarterly. A special meeting of the board of directors may be called by the banking board. The board of directors shall maintain minutes of each meeting including the record of attendance. A director who fails to attend three consecutive meetings of the board of directors shall cease to be a director unless such absence is satisfactorily explained to the banking board.

The board of directors shall establish the policies and procedures necessary for the proper exercise of fiduciary powers by the trust company. In discharging this responsibility, the board of directors may assign, by action duly entered in the minutes, the administration of the trust company's powers as the board of directors may consider proper to assign to any director, officer, employee, or committee as it may designate.

The board of directors of a trust company may declare dividends from retained earnings and from other components of capital specifically approved by the banking board so long as the declaration is made in compliance with the rules established by the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1192, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-116 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-502. Director and officer insurance and fidelity bonds - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the following is enforceable and in conformity with the public policy of this state, as expressed in this article, including the provisions of section 11-101-102:

Any insurance policy, form, contract, endorsement, or certificate in effect or issued on or after April 30, 1993, that provides insurance coverage to directors or officers, or both, of a trust company but that does not grant coverage or that excludes coverage for claims made by any depository insurance organization or other state or federal corporation, organization, entity, or agency acting as receiver, conservator, or liquidator of such trust company, whether in its own name or in behalf of any other person or entity; or

Any fidelity bond, financial institution bond, or depository institution bond in effect or issued on or after April 30, 1993, that provides for termination of such bond upon the taking over of any trust company by a receiver or other liquidator or by state or federal officials.

No provision of this article shall be construed to contravene or modify the expressed public policy set forth in this section.

The directors of a trust company shall:

Require good and sufficient fidelity bonds on all active officers and employees, whether or not they draw salary or compensation, which bonds must provide for indemnity to the trust company on account of any losses sustained by it as the result of any dishonest, fraudulent, or criminal conduct by them acting independently or in collusion or combination with any person. The bonds may be in individual, schedule, or blanket form, and the trust company shall pay the premiums for the bonds.

Require suitable insurance protection to the trust company against burglary, robbery, theft, and other insurable hazards to which the trust company may be exposed in the operations of its business on the premises or elsewhere; and

Prescribe, at least once in each calendar year, the amount or penal sum of the bonds and policies specified in this section and the sureties or underwriters thereon after giving due and careful consideration to all known elements and factors constituting such risk or hazard. The directors shall record the action in the board's minutes.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1193, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) added, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1483, § 51, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-117.5 as it existed prior to 2003.